Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 4

Wildlife Resources Fund

70-1-401. Wildlife resources fund established.

All moneys sent to the state treasury in payment of licenses, advertising, contraband, fines, penalties, and forfeitures arising from the wildlife resources laws of this state shall be set aside. This fund shall constitute a fund known as the “wildlife resources fund” for:

The payment of the wildlife resources agency's necessary and incidental expenses;

The payment of the salaries and traveling expenses of the director, office assistants, and other persons appointed or employed by the director;

The purchase of lands suitable for wildlife resources farms, reservations, wildlife management areas, fishing areas, access areas, fish hatcheries or rearing ponds;

The construction of suitable buildings, ponds, and propagation pens, and the purchase and propagation of wildlife, and other essentials necessary to restock the state or maintain wildlife resources farms, reservations, fisheries and hatcheries;

The promotion, advancement and efficient management of wildlife, including educational activities to that end; and

Any purpose of or in consequence of this title not otherwise provided for.

No part of the funds realized from the sale of licenses, advertising, from contrabands, fines, penalties, forfeitures, or from any privilege taxes levied under this title shall be used for any other purposes than those set out in subsection (a), nor shall any part of the wildlife resources fund be diverted to the general fund or any other public fund. Likewise, interest accruing on investments and deposits of the wildlife resources fund shall be returned to the fund and remain a part of it, and under no circumstances shall such interest be diverted to any other public fund.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 9; 1979, ch. 286, § 1; T.C.A., § 51-128; Acts 2000, ch. 837, §§ 2, 3.